en: crystallized, crystallised
bg: кристализиран, кристализирана, кристализирани, кристализирани
ca: cristal·litzat, cristal·litzada, cristal·litzats, cristal·litzades
es: cristalizado, cristalizada, cristalizados, cristalizadas
fi: kiteytynyt, kiteytynyt, kiteytynyt, kiteytynyt
fr: cristallisé, cristallisée, cristallisés, cristallisées
hr: kristaliziran, kristalizirana, kristalizirani, kristalizirane
hu: kristályosított, kristályosított, kristályosított, kristályosított
it: cristallizzato, cristallizzata, cristallizzati, cristallizzate
nl: gekristalliseerd, gekristalliseerde, gekristalliseerde, gekristalliseerde
pl: krystalizowany, krystalizowana, krystalizowane, krystalizowane
pt: cristalizado, cristalizada, cristalizados, cristalizadas
sv: krystalliserad, krystalliserat, krystalliserade
uk: кристалізований, кристалізована, кристалізоване, кристалізовані, кристалічний, кристалічна, кристалічне, кристалічні

en: oiled
bg: маслен, маслена, маслени, маслено
ca: oliat, oliada, oliats, oliades
de: geölt, geölte, geölter, geöltes
es: aceitado, aceitada, aceitados, aceitadas
fi: öljytty, öljyttyjä, öljyttyä, öljyttyjen, öljyttyjä
fr: huilé, huilée, huilés, huilées
hr: uljepšan, uljepšana, uljepšani, uljepšane
hu: olajozott
it: unto, unta, unti, unte
nl: geolied, geoliede
pl: olejowany, olejowana, olejowane, olejowanych, olejowanej, olejowanego
pt: oleado, oleada, oleados, oleadas
sv: oljad, oljat, oljade

de: mit sonnenblumenöl geölt
en: with sunflower oil
bg: със слълчогледово олио, със слълчогледово масло, с олио от слънчоглед
ca: amb oli de gira-sol
es: con aceite de girasol
fi: auringonkukkaöljyllä
fr: à l'huile de tournesol
hr: suncokretovim uljem
hu: napraforgóolajjal
it: con olio di girasole
nl: met zonnebloemolie
pl: z olejem słonecznikowym
pt: com óleo de girassol
ro: cu ulei de floarea-soarelui
sv: med solrosolja

de: ungeschwefelt, ungeschwefelte
pt: sem sulfitos

en: standardized, standardised
bg: стандартизирано
fr: standardisé, standardisée, standardisés, standardisées
hr: standardizirano
uk: стандартизований, стандартизована, стандартизоване, стандартизовані

en: normalized, normalised
uk: нормалізований, нормалізоване, нормалізована, нормалізовані

en: seasoned, with seasoning, with liquid seasoning
de: gewürzter, gewuerzter, gewürzter, gewuerzter, flüssig gewürzt

en: treated
de: behandelt, behandelte, behandelter, behandeltes, behandelten, behandeltem
es: tratada, tratado, tratadas, tratados
hu: kezelt, kezelve
it: trattato, trattati, trattata, trattate
nl: bewerkt
pt: tratada, tratado, tratadas, tratados

en: untreated
ca: sense tractar, sense tractament
de: unbehandelt, unbehandelte, unbehandelter, unbehandeltes, unbehandelten, unbehandeltem
es: sin tratar
fr: non traitée
hu: kezeletlen
it: non trattato, non trattati, non trattata, non trattate
pt: não tratado, não tratada, não tratados, não tratadas
ro: netratat, netratată, netratați, netratate
sv: obehandlad, obehandlat, obehandlade

en: rinsed
da: skyllet
fr: rincé, rincée, rincés, rincées
sv: sköljd, sköljt, sköljda

en: washed
sv: tvättad, tvättat, tvättade

en: bleached
de: gebleicht, gebleichte, gebleichter, gebleichtes, gebleichten, gebleichtem
hu: fehérített
sv: blekt, blekta
uk: вибілений, вибілена, вибілене, вибілені

en: unbleached, un-bleached
de: ungebleicht, ungebleichte, ungebleichter, ungebleichtes, ungebleichten, ungebleichtem
hu: fehérítetlen
uk: невибілений, невибілена, невибілене, невибілені

en: malted
de: gemälzt, gemälzte, gemälzter, gemälztes, gemälzten, gemälztem
es: malteado, malteada, malteados, malteadas
fi: mallastettu
fr: malté, maltée, maltés, maltées, malte, maltee, maltes, maltees
it: maltato, maltata, maltati, maltate
nl: gemout, gemoute
pl: słodowana, słodowany, słodowane
pt: maltado, maltada
sv: mältad, mältat, mältade
uk: солодовий, солодова, солодове, солодові

fr: non-maltées
de: nicht gemälzt, nicht gemälzte, nicht gemälztes
es: no malteado, no malteada, sin malta
it: non maltato, non maltata, senza malto
nl: niet gemout, niet gemoute, niet gemouten
pl: niesłodowana, niesłodowany, niesłodowane
pt: não maltado, não maltada, sem malte
sv: icke mältad, icke mältat, inte mältade

en: deodorized, deodorised
ca: desodoritzat
de: desodoriert, desodorierte, desodoriertes, desodorierter, desodorierten, desodoriertem
es: desodorizado, desodorizada, desodorizados, desodorizadas
fr: désodorisé, désodorisée
hu: szagtalanított
it: deodorato, deodorata, deodorati, deodorate
nl: ontgeurde
pt: desodorizado, desodorizada, desodorizados, desodorizadas
ro: deodorizat
uk: деодорований, деодорована, деодороване, деодоровані

en: non-deodorized, non-deodorised
de: nicht desodoriert, nicht desodorierte, nicht desodorierten, nicht desodoriertes
es: no desodorizado, no desodorizada, no desodorizados, no desodorizadas
fr: non-désodorisée
it: non deodorizzato, non deodorizzata, non deodorizzati, non deodorizzate
nl: niet ontgeurd, niet ontgeurde, niet ontgeurden, niet ontgeurdes
pt: não desodorizado, não desodorizada, não desodorizados, não desodorizadas

en: nixtamalized, nixtamalised
de: nixtamalisiert, nixtamalisierte, nixtamalisiertes, nixtamalisierten
es: nixtamalizado, nixtamalizada
fr: nixtamalisé, nixtamalisée, nixtamalisés, nixtamalisées
it: nixtamalizzato, nixtamalizzata, nixtamalizzati, nixtamalizzate
nl: nixtamaliseerd, nixtamaliseerde, nixtamaliseerdes, nixtamaliseerden
pt: nixtamalizado, nixtamalizada, nixtamalizados, nixtamalizadas
ro: nixtamalizat, nixtamalizată, nixtamalizați, nixtamalizate

en: irradiated, treated with irradiation
de: bestrahlt, bestrahlt, bestrahlte, bestrahltes
es: irradiado, irradiada, irradiados, irradiadas
fr: irradié, irradiée, irradiés, irradiées
it: irradiato, irradiata, irradiati, irradiate
lt: apšvitintas, apšvitinta, apšvitinti
lv: starojumā apstrādāts, starojumā apstrādāta, starojumā apstrādāti
nl: bestraald, bestraalde, bestraalder, bestraaldes
pt: irradiado, irradiada, irradiados, irradiadas
ro: iradiat, iradiată, iradiați, iradiate
uk: опромінений, опромінена, опромінене, опром

en: non-irradiated, not treated with irradiation, without irradiation
bg: неподложен на облъчване, без облъчване
ca: no irradiat, no tractat amb irradiació, sense irradiació
de: nicht bestrahlt, nicht mit Bestrahlung behandelt, ohne Bestrahlung
es: no irradiado, no tratado con irradiación, sin irradiación
fr: non irradié, non irradiée, non irradiés, non irradiées, sans irradiation
hr: neozrađen, neobrađen zračenjem, bez zračenja
it: non irradiato, non trattato con irradiazione, senza irradiazione
lt: neirradiuotas, neteršiant spinduliuote
lv: neirradiēts, netraucēts ar starojumu, bez starojuma
nl: niet bestraald, niet behandeld met bestraling, zonder bestraling
pt: não irradiado, não tratado com irradiação, sem irradiação
ro: neiradiat, netratat prin iradiere, fără iradiere
sv: icke bestrålad, icke bestrålat, inte bestrålade, inte behandlad med bestrålning, utan bestrålning